Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2899YH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 598 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 8A.379 Iowa state capitol 1 historical society established. 2 1. The Iowa state capitol historical society is 3 established, consisting of the following members: 4 a. Twelve members of the general assembly serving as 5 ex officio, nonvoting members, three representatives to be 6 appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, three 7 representatives to be appointed by the minority leader of the 8 house of representatives, three senators to be appointed by the 9 president of the senate after consultation with the majority 10 leader of the senate, and three senators to be appointed by the 11 minority leader of the senate. 12 b. Eighteen residents of the state of Iowa to be appointed 13 by the governor. 14 c. The director of the department or the directorâs 15 designee. 16 2. a. The members of the Iowa state capitol historical 17 society who are appointed by the governor shall be appointed 18 to four-year terms of office and until their successors are 19 appointed, three terms of which shall expire every two years. 20 Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the governor for 21 the unexpired term of the original appointee. 22 b. The legislative members of the Iowa state capitol 23 historical society shall be appointed to terms of office 24 as provided in section 4A.13, unless sooner terminated 25 by a society member ceasing to be a member of the general 26 assembly. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment of the 27 original appointing authority for the unexpired term of their 28 predecessors. 29 c. The term of office of each appointive voting member of 30 the Iowa state capitol historical society shall begin on the 31 first of May of the odd-numbered year in which the member is 32 appointed. 33 3. The Iowa state capitol historical society shall organize 34 biennially by election of a chairperson from its membership. 35 -1- LSB 2899YH (2) 91 ss/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 598 The director or directorâs designee shall serve as secretary 1 to the society. 2 4. It shall be the duty of the Iowa state capitol historical 3 society to collect and preserve, in a location that is open 4 to the public, the history of the state capitol, the events 5 that have occurred at the state capitol, the people who have 6 worked at the state capitol, the ideas that have emerged from 7 the state capitol, and the architecture and art of the state 8 capitol building and related areas. 9 5. The Iowa state capitol historical society may make 10 recommendations to the capitol planning commission regarding 11 projects, plans, and opportunities relating to the state 12 capitol building and grounds. 13 6. The Iowa state capitol historical society shall be 14 funded through donations, grants, loans, and contributions in 15 accordance with section 565.3 from any public or private source 16 for the purpose of executing the duties of the society under 17 this section. Moneys received by the society pursuant to this 18 subsection shall be deposited in a fund which shall be created 19 in the state treasury under the control of the department. 20 Moneys credited to the fund are appropriated to the society 21 for the purpose of executing the duties of the society under 22 this section and shall not be transferred, used, obligated, 23 appropriated, or otherwise encumbered, except as provided in 24 this section. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the 25 fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 26 a fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 27 expenditure for the purposes designated. Notwithstanding 28 section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in 29 the fund shall be credited to the fund. 30